Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB863.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Kenneth C. Larson, Jr., Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Kenneth C. Larson, Jr., was born April 26, 1934.(2) Mr. Larson was a distinguished engineer, visionary leader and passionate advocate for infrastructure improvements in the Northern Tier region.(3) Mr. Larson dedicated his career to advancing transportation systems that enhanced safety, efficiency and economic vitality for the Northern Tier region and beyond.(4) Mr. Larson's expertise and unwavering commitment contributed significantly to the design and development of key transportation projects that have positively impacted the 12345678910111213141516171819 lives of countless individuals and businesses.(5) In addition to his professional achievements, Mr. Larson generously gave his time and knowledge to mentor young engineers, support community initiatives and advocate for sustainable and forward-thinking infrastructure solutions.(6) After graduating from high school in 1952, Mr. Larson served 14 years in the Navy Reserve and received an honorable discharge.(7) In 1956, Mr. Larson graduated from Bucknell University and later worked in the former Department of Forests and Waters, the former Department of Highways and PennDOT.(8) Through his work at PennDOT, Mr. Larson was appointed to supervise construction and maintenance projects in multiple counties and in 1966 became the youngest appointed district engineer.(9) Among Mr. Larson's career accomplishments were assisting in the completion of portions of U.S. Route 15 and Interstate 80, serving as liaison with the Thornburgh administration, assisting in the implementation of computer-aided drafting and design in Pennsylvania, inspecting delinquent bridges and assisting in road improvements.(10) As the chief executive officer of the Larson Design Group, Mr. Larson's vision was to create careers so that talented engineers, architects and surveyors would remain in Lycoming County.(11) Mr. Larson passed away December 22, 2024.(b) Designation.--The portion of Interstate 180 from the Lycoming-Northumberland County line to the interchange with existing U.S. Route 15 and U.S. Route 220 in Lycoming County is 20250SB0863PN0962 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designated the Kenneth C. Larson, Jr., Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0863PN0962 - 3 - 123456